Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 12 Water Pollution

46-12-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter the following terms shall, where the context permits, be construed as follows:

“Boat” means any vessel or water craft whether moved by oars, paddles, sails, or other power mechanism, inboard or outboard, or any other vessel or structure floating upon the water whether or not capable of self locomotion, including house boats, barges, and similar floating objects.

“Clean Water Act” refers to the federal law enacted under 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., and all amendments thereto.

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management or any subordinate or subordinates to whom the director has delegated the powers and duties vested in him or her by this chapter.

Wherever reference is made in this chapter to any order of the director and the order shall have been modified by the court, the order referred to shall be taken to be the order of the director as so modified.

“Discharge” means the addition of any pollutant to the waters from any point source.

“Effluent limitation” means any restriction or prohibitions, established in accord with the provisions of this chapter or under the federal Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., on quantities, rates, and concentrations of chemical, physical, biological, radiological, and other constituents which are discharged into the waters.

“Fecal coliform bacteria” means organisms within the intestines of warm blooded animals that indicate the presence of fecal material, and the potential presence of organisms capable of causing disease in humans.

“Groundwaters” includes all underground waters of whatever nature.

“Marine Sanitation Device-Type I” means a marine toilet which, under prescribed test conditions, will produce an effluent that will not exceed a fecal coliform bacteria count of one thousand (1,000) parts per one hundred (100) milliliters and have no visible solids.

“Marine Sanitation Device-Type II” means a marine toilet which, under prescribed test conditions will produce an effluent that does not exceed a fecal coliform bacteria count of two hundred (200) parts per one hundred (100) milliliters, and have suspended solids not greater than one hundred and fifty (150) milligrams per liter.

“Marine Sanitation Device-Type III” means a marine toilet which is designed to prevent the discharge from the boat of any treated or untreated sewage, or any waste derived from sewage.

“Marine toilet” means any toilet on or within any boat as that term is defined herein.

“No discharge zone” means an environmentally sensitive area of the waters of the state which has been declared by the department of environmental management pursuant to the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., to be an area in which any discharge of sewage is prohibited.

“Person” includes an individual, trust, firm, joint stock company, corporation (including a quasi government corporation) partnership, association, syndicate, municipality, municipal or state agency, fire district, club, nonprofit agency, or any subdivision, commission, department, bureau, agency, or department of state or federal government (including any quasi government corporation) or of any interstate body.

“Point source” means any discernible, confined, and discrete conveyance, including, but not limited to, any pipe, ditch, channel, tunnel, conduit, well, discrete fissure, container, rolling stock, concentrated animal feeding operation, or vessel or other floating craft from which pollutants are or may be discharged. This term does not include return flows from irrigated agriculture.

“Pollutant” means any material or effluent which may alter the chemical, physical, biological, or radiological characteristics and/or integrity of water, including, but not limited to, dredged spoil, solid waste, incinerator residue, sewage, garbage, sewage sludge, munitions, chemical wastes, biological materials, radioactive materials, heat, wrecked or discarded equipment, cellar dirt or industrial, municipal, agricultural, or other waste petroleum or petroleum products, including but not limited to oil.

“Polluting” means the causing of pollution.

“Pollution” means the man made or man induced alteration of the chemical, physical, biological, and radiological integrity of water.

“Publicly owned treatment works” means any facility for the treatment of pollutants owned by the state or any political subdivision thereof, municipality, or other public entity, including any quasi government corporation.

“Release” means any spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, emitting, emptying, injecting, escaping, leaching, dumping, or disposing of any pollutant into a surface water or wetland, or onto or below the land surface.

“Schedule of compliance” means a schedule of remedial measures including an enforceable sequence of actions, or operations, leading to compliance with an effluent limitation or any other limitation, prohibition, or standard.

“Sewage” means fecal material and human waste, or wastes from toilets and other receptacles intended to receive or retain body waste, and any wastes, including wastes from human households, commercial establishments, and industries, and storm water runoff, that are discharged to or otherwise enter a publicly owned treatment works.

“Underground storage tank” means any one or combination of tanks (including underground pipes connected thereto) which is used to contain an accumulation of petroleum product or hazardous materials, and the volume of which (including the volume of the underground pipes connected thereto) is ten percent (10%) or more beneath the surface of the ground.

“Waters” includes all surface waters including all waters of the territorial sea, tidewaters, all inland waters of any river, stream, brook, pond, or lake, and wetlands, as well as all groundwaters.

“Eutrophication” means a reduction of dissolved oxygen from excessive plant growth, chiefly algae, typically as an effect of increased nutrient loadings, to levels that impair the viability of other aquatic life.

“Nutrient” means organic materials and chemicals, including especially nitrogen and phosphorous and their compounds, that are biologically reactive and necessary for life.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1914, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 125, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 634, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-1

; P.L. 1963, ch. 89, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 261, §§ 1, 16; P.L. 1980, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 253, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 332, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 222, § 1.

46-12-2.
Administration.

It shall be the responsibility of the director of the department of environmental management to administer this chapter. Within the department of environmental management, the director may employ personnel who shall come within the classified service in accordance with the laws of this state for the purposes of this chapter, and may delegate to a subordinate or subordinates any or all the powers and duties vested in the director hereunder. The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary for the expenses of administering this chapter.

The department of environmental management is hereby designated as the state water pollution control agency for this state for all purposes of the Clean Water Act, as amended, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., and is hereby authorized to take all action necessary or appropriate to secure to this state the benefits of that act.

The department of environmental management is hereby designated to operate the underground injection control program under the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. § 300f et seq., and is hereby authorized to take all action necessary or appropriate to secure to this state the benefits of that program.

The department of environmental management is hereby designated to administer the wellhead protection program as approved by the federal Environmental Protection Agency and in accordance with the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. § 300f et seq., and is hereby authorized to take all actions necessary or appropriate to secure to this state the benefits of that program. The department of environmental management shall cooperate and coordinate wellhead protection program activities with the department of health public drinking water supply program.

The department of environmental management is hereby designated to administer the underground storage tank program as approved by the federal Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq., and is hereby authorized to take all necessary or appropriate actions to secure to this state the benefits of this program, including participation via cooperative agreement with the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) in the leaking underground storage tank trust fund.

The department of environmental management is hereby designated to establish, administer, and enforce standards for nutrients as necessary to protect, maintain and/or improve the ecological functions of the marine and aquatic resources of the state; and to prepare, adopt, and implement plans as necessary and appropriate to accomplish the purposes of managing nutrient loadings and preventing, abating, and/or eliminating the deleterious effects of nutrients, including, but not limited to, eutrophication, harmful algal blooms, hypoxia, anoxia, oxygen-stress-induced population shifts, and/or fish kills. To implement the purposes of this subsection, the department shall implement measures to achieve an overall goal of reducing nitrogen loadings from waste water treatment facilities by fifty percent (50%) by December 31, 2008, which date, in its implementation, may be adjusted to be consistent with compliance with permit modifications, through waste water treatment facility upgrades scheduled to be undertaken by December 31, 2006, and through proposed permit modifications, which shall be issued by the department on or before July 1, 2004. The department shall report on the implementation of these measures in the report required by §

46-12-3(25)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1914, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 125, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 634, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-30

; P.L. 1980, ch. 239, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 222, § 1.

46-12-2.1.
Repealed.

46-12-3.
Powers and duties of the director.

In addition to the other powers granted the director of the department of environmental management herein, the director shall have and may exercise the following powers and duties:

To exercise general supervision of the administration and enforcement of this chapter, and all rules and regulations and orders promulgated hereunder;

To develop comprehensive programs for the prevention, control, and abatement of new or existing pollution of the waters of this state;

To advise, consult, and cooperate with other agencies of the state, the federal government, other states, and interstate agencies and with affected groups, political subdivisions, and industries in the furtherance of the purposes of this chapter;

To accept and administer loans and grants from the federal government and from other sources, public or private, for the carrying out of any of its functions, which loans and grants shall not be expended for other than the purposes for which provided;

To encourage, participate in, or conduct studies, investigations, research, and demonstrations relating to water pollution and its causes, prevention, control, and abatement thereof, as he or she may deem advisable and necessary for the discharge of his or her duties under this chapter;

To collect and disseminate information relating to water pollution and the prevention, control, and abatement thereof;

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (24) below, to promulgate standards of water quality and to classify the waters of the state accordingly;

To administer state grants to municipalities and political subdivisions for the construction of sewage treatment works;

To hold hearings, to issue notices of hearings and subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of evidence, and to administer oaths and to take testimony, that he or she may deem necessary;

To approve, pursuant to standards adopted by the environmental standards board, the construction, modification, and operation of discharge systems or any parts thereof, and to require the prior submission of plans, specifications, and other data relative to discharge systems and to require that the plans, specifications, or other data be certified by a professional engineer registered in Rhode Island, and to inspect the systems either under construction or in operation;

To issue a permit for the discharge of any pollutant or combination of pollutants or to issue a general permit authorizing a category of discharges within a geographical area upon conditions as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and of the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., which may include, but not be limited to, providing for specific effluent limitations and levels of treatment technology, monitoring, recording, and reporting standards, or to deny a permit or general permit;

To renew, revoke, modify, or suspend in whole or in part any permit, order, or schedule of compliance pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, and any rules and regulations promulgated thereunder;

To approve the discharge of pollutants into the waters of this state pursuant to all applicable standards;

To require publicly owned treatment works to adopt and implement requirements regarding the pretreatment of pollutants consistent with existing federal requirements, and to require compliance by all persons with pretreatment requirements;

To issue such orders as may be necessary to prevent the unauthorized construction, modification, or operation of discharge systems and the discharge of pollutants into the waters of this state;

To require proper maintenance and operation of discharge systems;

To consult the advisory council on environmental affairs on the policies and plans for the control and abatement of pollution;

To make, issue, amend, and revoke reasonable rules and regulations for the prevention, control, and abatement of pollution and the enforcement of orders issued hereunder, including public notice and comment requirements;

To exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

To approve the operation of treatment facilities, pursuant to the provisions of chapters 3, 11, and 18 of title 44;

To promulgate and enforce rules and regulations to govern the location, design, construction, maintenance, and operation of underground storage facilities used for storing petroleum products or hazardous materials to prevent, abate, and remedy the discharge of petroleum products and hazardous materials into the waters of the state; provided that all underground storage tanks and associated piping installed after September 1, 1991, shall provide for secondary containment in a manner approved by the director; and provided, that single-walled tanks and/or piping installed prior to May 8, 1985, shall be permitted to remain in use until December 22, 2017, and single-walled tanks and/or piping installed between May 8, 1985, and July 20, 1992, shall be permitted to remain in use for thirty-two (32) years from the date of installation if the owner/operator of the single-walled tank or piping performs an annual facility compliance inspection to ensure structural integrity; and provided, further, that the installation of underground storage tanks is prohibited at sites located within wellhead protection areas for community water supply wells as designated by the director and consistent with chapter 13.1 of this title. This prohibition shall not apply to the replacement or upgrading of existing underground storage tanks installed prior to July 1, 1991, provided that such activity take place in accordance with all applicable state and federal regulations. The department of environmental management shall by January 1, 2011, develop recommendations for phasing out the stage II vapor recovery program with the required removal of single-walled underground storage tanks in order to achieve the objectives of both program efforts in a cost effective and efficient manner. The department of environmental management shall report its findings to the chair of the house committee on environment and natural resources and to the chair of the senate committee on environment and agriculture on or before January 1, 2011;

To promulgate and enforce rules and regulations to govern the installation, construction, operation, and abandonment of monitoring wells;

To promulgate and enforce rules and regulations to govern the location, design, installation, operation and maintenance of subsurface disposal systems which receive the discharge of pollutants and of subsurface containment systems, including underground storage tanks, used to contain or control the discharge of pollutants below the ground surface.

In connection with the dredging and transportation and disposal of dredge material, to promulgate and adopt water quality standards that conform with the federal Environmental Protection Agency’s applicable water quality rules and regulations and guidelines, including, but not limited to, the federal Environmental Protection Agency’s rules and regulations and guidelines for deviating from said standards. The department of environmental management shall also apply the applicable standards and guidelines and adopt the procedures as set forth in the manual identified as “Evaluation of Dredge Material for Purpose of Ocean Disposal. Testing Manual Put Together by EPA and Army Corps of Engineers in February, 1991” and any amendments or supplements or successor manuals thereto to the extent that the same are relevant to dredging, transportation and/or disposal of dredge materials in tidal waters or any documents or manuals approved by the federal Environmental Protection Agency relating to dredging, transportation and/or disposal of dredge materials; and

To prepare and to submit to the governor, the speaker of the house, the president of the senate, the chairperson of the house committee on environment and natural resources and the chairperson of the senate committee on environment and agriculture, not later than February 1, 2005, a plan, including an implementation program with cost estimates, recommended sources of funding, measurable goals, objectives, and targets and limitations for nutrient introduction into the waters of the state, for the purposes of: (i) managing nutrient loadings and the effects of nutrients in the waters of the state; and (ii) preventing and eliminating conditions of eutrophication.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1914, § 2; P.L. 1921, ch. 2090, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 125, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 634, § 20; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-3

; P.L. 1963, ch. 89, § 3; P.L. 1966, ch. 261, § 4; P.L. 1977, ch. 182, § 16; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 320, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 366, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 271, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 281, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 160, § 1.

46-12-3.1.
[Transferred.]

46-12-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-3.1

; P.L. 1983, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 300, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 155; P.L. 1996, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 281, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2012.

46-12-4.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 182, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 300, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 155; Repealed by P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2012.

46-12-5.
Prohibitions.

It shall be unlawful for any person to place any pollutant in a location where it is likely to enter the waters or to place or cause to be placed any solid waste materials, junk, or debris of any kind whatsoever, organic or non organic, in any waters.

It shall be unlawful for any person to discharge any pollutant into the waters except as in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and any rules and regulations promulgated hereunder and pursuant to the terms and conditions of a permit.

It shall be unlawful to construct or install any industrial, commercial, or other establishment, to make any modification or addition thereto, or to undertake any development which may result in the discharge of any pollutant into the waters of the state, unless the discharge is made to a system or means to prevent pollution approved by the director.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) above, an applicant seeking a water quality certification from the department of environmental management in connection with the disposal of dredge material at a site as provided for in §

46-23-18.3

and in a manner consistent with a comprehensive program as provided for in §

46-23-6(1)(ii)(H)

, shall be granted said water quality certification if the department of environmental management determines that the proposal is consistent with the water quality standards adopted pursuant to §

46-12-3(24)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1914, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 125, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 634, § 3; P.L. 1966, ch. 261, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-4

; P.L. 1970, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 271, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 281, § 4.

46-12-6.
Investigation and hearing — Records.

If the director shall have cause to believe that any person is violating any provision of this chapter, or any regulation, permit, or order of the department of environmental management adopted in accordance therewith, it shall be the director’s duty to cause the matter to be investigated. The director may schedule a hearing, receive evidence, and hear witnesses in behalf of the persons believed to be in violation.

The director shall maintain records concerning all investigations undertaken and findings made pursuant to this section. The records shall be made available for public inspection and shall include the following information:

The names and addresses of persons investigated;

The date or dates of any hearing or hearings conducted with respect to those persons and the time and place of the hearings;

Any findings made by the director after the conclusion of the hearings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1914, § 4; P.L. 1921, ch. 2090, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 125, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 634, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-5

; P.L. 1966, ch. 261, § 6; P.L. 1970, ch. 88, § 2; P.L. 1970, ch. 289, § 2; P.L. 1977, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1.

46-12-7.
Subpoena of witnesses — Enforcement.

All subpoenas shall be served as subpoenas in civil cases in superior court, and witnesses so subpoenaed shall be entitled to the same fees for attendance and travel as are provided witnesses in civil cases in superior court. In cases of contumacy or refusal to obey the command of the subpoena so issued, the superior court shall have jurisdiction upon application of the director, with proof by affidavit of the fact, to issue a rule or order returnable in not less than two (2) nor more than five (5) days directing the person to show cause why he or she should not be adjudged in contempt.

Upon return of the order, the justice before whom the matter is brought for hearing shall examine under oath the person, and the person shall be given an opportunity to be heard, and if the justice shall determine that the person has refused without reasonable cause or legal excuse to be examined or to answer a legal or pertinent question, the justice may impose a fine upon the offender or forthwith commit the offender to the adult correctional institutions, there to remain until the offender submits to do the act which the offender was so required to do, or is discharged according to law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1914, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 125, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 634, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-6

; P.L. 1966, ch. 261, § 7; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 41.

46-12-8.
Expert assistance in investigations and prosecutions.

The director may employ any professional or expert services that the director may deem desirable in making any investigation or in conducting any prosecution for the violation of the provisions of this chapter, within the limit of the amount appropriated therefor by the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1914, § 4; P.L. 1921, ch. 2090, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 125, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 634, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-7

; P.L. 1966, ch. 261, § 16; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1.

46-12-9.
Notices of violation and compliance orders.

The director shall follow the procedures provided in §

42-17.1-2(21)

in issuing any notice of violation or compliance order authorized pursuant to this chapter or any rules, regulations, or permits promulgated thereunder.

Where an order of the director does not specify the system or means to be adopted, the person against whom an order is entered shall, before proceeding to install a system or means, submit to the director a plan or statement describing the system or means that the person proposes to adopt.

Any order or notice issued by the director shall be eligible for recordation under chapter 13 of title 34. The director shall forward the original order or notice to the city or town wherein the subject property is located and the order or notice shall be recorded in the land evidence records in the city or town wherein the subject property is located. Any subsequent transferee of that property shall be responsible for complying with the requirements of the order or notice. Upon satisfactory completion of the requirements of the order or notice, the director shall provide written notice of the same to the owner of the subject property, which notice shall be similarly eligible for recordation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1914, § 5; P.L. 1921, ch. 2090, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 125, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 634, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-8

; P.L. 1966, ch. 261, § 16; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 147, § 1, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 148, § 1, effective July 3, 2021.

46-12-10.
Emergency powers.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the director, upon receipt of evidence that a pollution source or combination of sources is presenting an imminent and substantial endangerment to the health of persons or to the welfare of persons where that endangerment is, to the livelihood of those persons, or to protect the environment, may, without prior notice of violation or hearing, take such action as the director deems necessary to protect the public health or safety or the environment. The actions may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

Issuing an immediate compliance order stating the existence of the violation and the action that the director deems necessary. Any order issued under this section without notice and prior hearing shall be effective no longer than forty-five (45) days; provided, however, that for good cause shown an order may be extended one additional period of up to forty-five (45) days; and/or

Obtaining injunctive relief or other order from the superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1914, § 5; P.L. 1921, ch. 2090, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 125, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 634, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-10

; P.L. 1966, ch. 261, § 16; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1.

46-12-11.
Service of orders.

A copy of each order entered by the director shall be sent to the person or persons affected thereby by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, by personal service, or by any other form of service now or hereafter authorized in a civil action under the laws of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1914, § 5; P.L. 1921, ch. 2090, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 125, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 634, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-11

; P.L. 1966, ch. 261, § 8; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1.

46-12-12.
Modification or revocation of order.

Any order of the director may at any time, or from time to time, after at least twenty (20) days’ notice in writing to the person or persons affected thereby, and after a hearing, if so requested by the affected person or persons, be modified or revoked by an order duly entered by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1914, § 5; P.L. 1921, ch. 2090, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 634, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-12

; P.L. 1966, ch. 261, § 16; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1.

46-12-13.
Civil penalties.

Except as specified in §§

46-12-26

and

46-12-27

, any person who shall violate the provisions of this chapter, or of any permit, rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant thereto, shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each day during which the violation occurs. In an action for enforcement brought in the superior court pursuant to this chapter or chapters 12.3, 12.4, or 12.5 of this title, the court also may order any person to pay to the director any and all costs incurred in the investigation, cleanup, and restoration of areas affected by pollutants in connection with any violation. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to limit the amount of monetary relief which the court can award in any action brought pursuant to any other provision of the general laws or pursuant to common law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1914, § 6; P.L. 1921, ch. 2090, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 125, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 634, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-13

; P.L. 1966, ch. 261, § 16; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 324, § 1.

46-12-14.
Criminal penalties.

Except as specified in §§

46-12-26

and

46-12-27

, any person who shall be found guilty of violating, willfully or with criminal negligence, any of the provisions of this chapter, or of any permit, rule, or regulation issued pursuant thereto, or an order of the director, shall be punished by a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or by both such fine and imprisonment; and every person shall be deemed guilty of a separate and distinct offense for each day during which the violation shall be repeated or continued.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement, representation, or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained under this chapter or by any permit, rule, regulation, or order issued under this chapter or who falsifies, tampers with, or knowingly renders inaccurate any monitoring device or method required to be maintained under this chapter or by any permit, rule, regulation, or order issued under this chapter, shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each instance of violation, or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1914, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 125, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 634, § 7; P.L. 1947, ch. 1834, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3334, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-14

; P.L. 1958, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 261, § 9; P.L. 1970, ch. 88, § 3; P.L. 1971, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 324, § 1.

46-12-15.
Inspection powers — Rules and regulations.

The director shall have full powers to inspect, and make orders regulating and directing all methods, means, and devices employed on any steamer or other vessel in the waters of the state, or at any installation on land, in receiving, carrying, storing, heating, handling or discharging any petroleum, gasoline, kerosene, tar, oil, or any product or mixture thereof; and the director may by order establish all rules and regulations to prevent the discharge or escape of any of the substances into the waters of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1914, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 125, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 634, § 8; P.L. 1947, ch. 1834, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3334, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-15

; P.L. 1966, ch. 261, § 16; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1.

46-12-16.
Prosecution of violations.

The director, without being required to enter into any recognizance or to give surety for costs, may institute civil or criminal proceedings for the violation of any provision of this chapter or of any permit, rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant thereto. It shall be the duty of the attorney general to carry out all proceedings brought by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1914, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 125, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 634, § 9; P.L. 1947, ch. 1834, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3334, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-17

; P.L. 1966, ch. 261, § 16; P.L. 1970, ch. 88, § 4; P.L. 1974, ch. 274, § 4; P.L. 1977, ch. 182, § 16; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1.

46-12-17.
Proceedings for enforcement.

The superior court for Providence County shall have concurrent jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this chapter and any rule, regulation, permit, or order issued pursuant thereto. Proceedings for enforcement may be instituted and prosecuted in the name of the director, by either the director or by the attorney general, and in any proceedings in which the director or the attorney general seeks injunctive relief, it shall not be necessary to show that without the relief, the injury that will result will be irreparable or that the remedy at law is inadequate. Proceedings provided in this section shall be in addition to and may be utilized in lieu of other administrative or judicial proceedings authorized by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 147, § 1, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 148, § 1, effective July 3, 2021.

46-12-18.
Records of operation.

The director may, by regulation, order, permit, or otherwise, require any person who discharges to the waters or who discharges to a publicly owned treatment works to:

Establish and maintain such records;

Make such reports;

Install, calibrate, use, and maintain such monitoring equipment or methods (including where appropriate, biological monitoring methods);

Sample such discharges (in accordance with such methods, at such locations, at such intervals, and in a manner as the director shall prescribe); and

Provide such other information relating to discharges into the waters or into a publicly owned treatment works as the director may reasonably require.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 634, § 14; P.L. 1950, ch. 2542, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-26

; P.L. 1966, ch. 261, § 16; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1.

46-12-19.
Public access to information.

Any permit, permit application, or effluent data shall be available to the public for inspection and copying.

Other records, reports, or information obtained under this chapter also may be made available to the public for inspection and copying; provided, that upon a showing, satisfactory to the director by any person, that the records, reports, or information or any part thereof, except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, would if made public divulge methods or processes entitled to protection as trade secrets of the person, the director shall consider, treat, and protect the record, report, or information, or part thereof, as confidential; provided, however, that the record, report, or information accorded confidential treatment may be disclosed or transmitted to other officers, employees, or authorized representatives of this state or of the United States concerned with carrying out this chapter or, when relevant, in any proceeding under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1.

46-12-20.
Rules — Proceedings.

In establishing any rule or regulation hereunder or in the conduct of proceedings or in any appeal from an order of the director provided for by this chapter, the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42 shall apply.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1914, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 125, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 634, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-29

; P.L. 1966, ch. 261, § 14; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1.

46-12-21.
Liability.

Any person who shall negligently or intentionally pollute groundwater shall be liable to any other person who is damaged by that pollution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1914, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 125, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 634, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-30

; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1.

46-12-22.
Access of enforcement officers to premises.

The attorney general, the director of the department of environmental management, and their agents, while in the performance of their duties, may at all reasonable times enter any premises, buildings, plant, or equipment, or other places belonging to, or controlled by, any person who is believed to be discharging to the waters or who is believed to be discharging to a publicly owned treatment works, and inspect the same or any part thereof, have access to and copy any records required to be maintained, inspect any monitoring equipment or monitoring method which is required, and have access to and sample any discharges. Any person obstructing, hindering, or in any way causing to be obstructed or hindered the director of the department of environmental management, the attorney general, or any of their agents in the performance of his or her duties, or who shall refuse to permit the director, the attorney general, or any of their agents entrance into any premises, buildings, plant, or equipment, or other places belonging to or controlled by the person, in the performance of his or her duties as such, shall be subject to the civil and criminal penalties set forth in §§

46-12-13

and

46-12-14

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1914, § 21; P.L. 1921, ch. 2090, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 125, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 634, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-31

; P.L. 1966, ch. 261, §§ 15, 16; P.L. 1977, ch. 182, § 16; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1.

46-12-23.
Town and city expenditures for pollution control.

The town council of every town and city council of every city are hereby authorized to make available sufficient money to pay for the proper control of the pollution of waters in their respective towns or cities, and the towns and cities may raise the money by the issue of interest bearing notes of the town or city, which notes shall not be considered in determining whether the indebtedness of the town or city is in excess of the statutory limitation; provided, however, that before any notes or any other evidences of indebtedness are issued, any and all plans and specifications for the proper control of the pollution of the waters shall be submitted to and receive the approval of the state department of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 952, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 46-12-32; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1.